District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-907

Articles of incorporation — Amendments; vote required for proposal and approval of amendments.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 483, ch. 397, § 7
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-907.
1981 Ed., § 29-1107.
1973 Ed., § 29-807.